Utah statutes.
59-5-104.   Statements filed -- Contents -- Falsification as perjury.
(1) (a)  Every producer engaged in the production of oil or gas from any well
or wells in the state shall file with the commission, on or before June 1 of
each year, on forms furnished by the commission, a statement containing the
information required by Subsection (1)(b) relating to the oil or gas:
(i)  produced; and
(ii) (A)  saved;
(B)  sold; or
(C)  transported from the field where the oil or gas was produced during the
preceding calendar year.
(b)  The statement required in Subsection (1)(a) shall include:
(i)  the name, description, and location of:
(A)  every well or wells; and
(B)  every field in which the well or wells are located;
(ii)  the number of barrels of oil, the cubic feet of gas, and quantity of
other hydrocarbon substances produced, including the percentage of production
from lands held in trust by the United States for any federally recognized
Indian tribe or its members;
(iii)  the value of the oil or gas; and
(iv)  any other reasonable and necessary information required by the
commission.
(2)  The statements or reports required to be filed with the commission shall
be signed and sworn to by the producer or a designee.
(3)  Any willful false swearing as to the purported material facts set out in
this report constitutes the crime of perjury and shall be punished as such
under Title 76, Utah Criminal Code.
